test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-kepidem_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
#  xerox:
#    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
#    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
#    App: lookup

Tests:


  Noun - kepidem: # 
    kepidem+N+Sg+Nom: kepidem
    kepidem+N+Sg+Gen: kepidem
    kepidem+N+Sg+Acc: kepidem
    kepidem+N+Sg+Ill: keeppidmân
    kepidem+N+Sg+Loc: keeppidmist
    kepidem+N+Sg+Com: keeppidmáin
    kepidem+N+Sg+Abe: kepidemttáá
    kepidem+N+Ess: kepideemmin
    kepidem+N+Par: kepideemmid
    kepidem+N+Pl+Nom: keeppidmeh
    kepidem+N+Pl+Gen: keeppidmij
    kepidem+N+Pl+Acc: keeppidmijd
    kepidem+N+Pl+Ill: keeppidmáid
    kepidem+N+Pl+Loc: keeppidmijn
    kepidem+N+Pl+Com: keeppidmijguin
    kepidem+N+Pl+Abe: keeppidmijttáá
